Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2098
Duties of officers.

Each officer shall have the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 98.